Washington statutes.
RCW 18.85.390

Disciplinary action—Order—Appeal.

If the director decides, after an adjudicative hearing, that the evidence supports the accusation by a preponderance of evidence, the director may impose sanctions authorized under RCW 18.85.041. In such event the director shall enter an order to that effect and shall file the same in the director's office and immediately mail a copy to the affected party at the address of record with the department. Upon instituting appeal in the superior court, the appellant shall give a cash bond to the state of Washington, which bond shall be filed with the clerk of the court, in the sum of one thousand dollars to be approved by the judge of said court, conditioned to pay all costs that may be awarded against an appellant in the event of an adverse decision, the bond and notice to be filed within thirty days from the date of the director's decision.

[ 2008 c 23 s 35; 2002 c 86 s 232; 1989 c 175 s 66; 1988 c 205 s 8; 1987 c 332 s 13; 1972 ex.s. c 139 s 20; 1951 c 222 s 25. Formerly RCW 18.85.271.]

NOTES:

Effective dates—2002 c 86: See note following RCW 18.08.340.

Part headings not law—Severability—2002 c 86: See RCW 18.235.902 and 18.235.903.

Effective date—1989 c 175: See note following RCW 34.05.010.